test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-panga_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - панга: # Ordinary nouns 'woman' - full paradigm including MWN
     панга+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: панга
     панга+N+SP+Gen+Indef: пангань
     панга+N+SP+Abl+Indef: пангада
     панга+N+SP+Dat+Indef: панганди
     панга+N+SP+Abe+Indef: пангафтома
     панга+N+SP+Comp+Indef: пангашка
     панга+N+SP+Ine+Indef: пангаса
     панга+N+SP+Ela+Indef: пангаста
     панга+N+SP+Ill+Indef: пангас
     панга+N+SP+Prl+Indef: пангава
     панга+N+SP+Tra+Indef: пангакс
     панга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: пангазе
     панга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: пангане
     панга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: пангазень
     панга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: панганень
     панга+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [пангазенди, пангазти]
     панга+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: панганенди
     панга+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: пангадон
     панга+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: пангафтомон
     панга+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1: пангашкан
     панга+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: пангасон
     панга+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: пангастон
     панга+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: пангазон
     панга+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: пангаван
     панга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: пангаце
     панга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: пангатне
     панга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: пангацень
     панга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: пангатнень
     панга+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: пангадот
     панга+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: пангафтомот
     панга+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2: пангашкат
     панга+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: пангасот
     панга+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: пангастот
     панга+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: пангазт
     панга+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: пангават
     панга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: пангац
     панга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: панганза
     панга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: панганц
     панга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: панганзон
     панга+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: панганцты
     панга+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: панганзонды
     панга+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: пангадонза
     панга+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: пангафтомонза
     панга+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3: пангашканза
     панга+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: пангасонза
     панга+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: пангастонза
     панга+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: пангазонза
     панга+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: пангаванза
     панга+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: панганьке
     панга+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: панганьконь
     панга+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: панганьконди
     панга+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: пангадонк
     панга+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: пангафтомонк
     панга+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1: пангашканк
     панга+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: пангасонк
     панга+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: пангастонк
     панга+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: пангазонк
     панга+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: пангаванк
     панга+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: панганте
     панга+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: пангантень
     панга+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: пангантенди
     панга+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: пангадонт
     панга+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: пангафтомонт
     панга+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2: пангашкант
     панга+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: пангасонт
     панга+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: пангастонт
     панга+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: пангазонт
     панга+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: пангавант
     панга+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: пангасна
     панга+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: пангаснон
     панга+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: пангаснонды
     панга+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: пангадост
     панга+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: пангафтомост
     панга+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3: пангашкаст
     панга+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: пангасост
     панга+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: пангастост
     панга+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: пангазост
     панга+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: пангаваст
     панга+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: пангат
     панга+N+Sg+Nom+Def: пангась
     панга+N+Sg+Gen+Def: пангать
     панга+N+Sg+Dat+Def: пангати
     панга+N+Pl+Nom+Def: пангатне
     панга+N+Pl+Gen+Def: пангатнень
     панга+N+Pl+Dat+Def: пангатненди    
     панга+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: пангавок
     панга+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/вок: панганьвок
     панга+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/вок: пангадовок
     панга+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Foc/вок: пангандивок
     панга+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Foc/вок: пангафтомовок
     панга+N+SP+Comp+Indef+Foc/вок: пангашкавок
     панга+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Foc/вок: пангасовок
     панга+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Foc/вок: пангастовок
     панга+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc/вок: пангасвок
     панга+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Foc/вок: пангававок
     панга+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Foc/вок: пангаксвок
     панга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пангазевок
     панга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: панганевок
     панга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пангазеньвок
     панга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: панганеньвок
     панга+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: [пангазендивок, пангазтивок]
     панга+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: панганендивок
     панга+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пангадонвок
     панга+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пангафтомонвок
     панга+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пангашканвок
     панга+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пангасонвок
     панга+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пангастонвок
     панга+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пангазонвок
     панга+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: пангаванвок
     панга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пангацевок
     панга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пангатневок
     панга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пангаценьвок
     панга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пангатненьвок
     панга+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пангадотвок
     панга+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пангафтомотвок
     панга+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пангашкатвок
     панга+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пангасотвок
     панга+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пангастотвок
     панга+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пангазтвок
     панга+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: пангаватвок
     панга+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пангацвок
     панга+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: панганзовок
     панга+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: панганцвок
     панга+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: панганзонвок
     панга+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: панганцтывок
     панга+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: панганзондывок
     панга+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пангадонзовок
     панга+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пангафтомонзовок
     панга+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пангашканзовок
     панга+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пангасонзовок
     панга+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пангастонзовок
     панга+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пангазонзовок
     панга+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: пангаванзовок
     панга+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/вок: панганькевок
     панга+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/вок: панганьконьвок
     панга+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Foc/вок: панганькондивок
     панга+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пангадонквок
     панга+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пангафтомонквок
     панга+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пангашканквок
     панга+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пангасонквок
     панга+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пангастонквок
     панга+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пангазонквок
     панга+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: пангаванквок
     панга+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пангантевок
     панга+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пангантеньвок
     панга+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пангантендивок
     панга+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пангадонтвок
     панга+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пангафтомонтвок
     панга+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пангашкантвок
     панга+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пангасонтвок
     панга+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пангастонтвок
     панга+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пангазонтвок
     панга+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: пангавантвок
     панга+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пангасновок
     панга+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пангаснонвок
     панга+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пангаснондывок
     панга+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пангадоствок
     панга+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пангафтомоствок
     панга+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пангашкаствок
     панга+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пангасоствок
     панга+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пангастоствок
     панга+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пангазоствок
     панга+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: пангаваствок
     панга+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: пангатвок
     панга+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: пангасьвок
     панга+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: пангатьвок
     панга+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: пангативок
     панга+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: пангатневок
     панга+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: пангатненьвок
     панга+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: пангатнендивок
